Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 5. Survey and Improvement of State Land.

Sec. 38.95.150.
Survey of state land.

A professional land surveyor registered to practice under AS 08.48 shall certify the location and monumentation of boundaries and the platting and subdivision of state land. This section does not apply to surveys, monumentation, platting, or subdivision performed by the federal government.

History.

(§ 1 ch 85 SLA 1981)

Sec. 38.95.160.
Improvements on state land.

The location and design of a publicly financed improvement on state land that costs more than $100,000 shall be supervised by a professional registered to practice under AS 08.48. A lease, easement, right-of-way, or other similar agreement that permits the use and improvement of state land under this section shall be documented by a recorded plat.

In this section,

“publicly financed improvement” means an improvement financed with state or federal money that is constructed by the state or an instrumentality of the state and includes, but is not limited to, onshore or offshore oil drilling or pumping operations, roads, bridges, pipelines, seismic lines, logging and mining operations, dams, buildings, and electric power transmission lines;

“state land” does not include land owned by the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 85 SLA 1981; am § 77 ch 152 SLA 1984)